District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.02

Admission.

(a)

The articles of incorporation or bylaws of a membership corporation may establish criteria or procedures for admission of members.

(b)

A person shall not be admitted as a member without the person’s consent.

(c)

If a membership corporation provides certificates of membership to the members, the certificates shall not be registered and shall not be transferable except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(d)

A person shall not be a member of a nonprofit corporation unless the person meets the definition of a “member” in § 29-401.02, regardless of whether the corporation refers to the person as a member.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(d)(9), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “transferable” for “able” in (c).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.